Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 16 Income Withholding

15-16-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to enhance the enforcement of support obligations by providing a swift and effective procedure for the withholding of income derived in this state to enforce support orders issued in this state or other jurisdictions, and by providing a mechanism by which income withholding, to enforce the support orders issued in this state, may be sought in other jurisdictions. This chapter shall be applicable to support obligations established or enforceable in this state, including support obligations enforceable pursuant to the Rhode Island state plan for child and spousal support enforcement, as the plan may be adopted and amended by the Rhode Island department of human services in accordance with title IV, part D, § 454 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 654, and as more fully defined in §

15-16-2

. This chapter shall be construed liberally to effect this purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 8; P.L. 1994, ch. 209, § 1.

15-16-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, except as may otherwise be required by the context:

“Agency” means either the court or agency of any other jurisdiction with income withholding functions similar to those of the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement defined in this chapter, including the issuance and enforcement of support orders.

“Child” means any child, whether above or below the age of majority, with respect to whom a support order exists.

“CSE system” means the Rhode Island family court/department of administration, division of taxation, child support computer enforcement system, which system maintains the official record of support orders and arrearages of all support orders entered upon it in accordance with applicable administrative orders issued by the Rhode Island family court.

“Court” means the Rhode Island family court and, when the context requires, means either the court or agency of any other jurisdiction with functions similar to those defined in this chapter, including the issuance and enforcement of support orders.

“Department” means the division of taxation, within the department of administration.

“Income” shall include amounts paid or payable by a payor who is subject to the jurisdiction of this state to an obligor as:

Compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, whether taxable or not taxable, and specifically including periodic payments pursuant to pension or retirement programs or insurance policies of any type; or

Benefit payments or other similar compensation paid or payable to the obligor by or through a department, agency, or political subdivision of the state or federal government or by an insurance company, including unemployment compensation benefits, workers’ compensation benefits, and temporary disability benefits, except where garnishment or attachment of benefit payments is prohibited by federal law.

“Income withholding order” means an order to withhold income of an obligor to pay support, arrearages, and fees, if any, authorized under this chapter, whether the order is issued by the department and filed with the clerk of the family court, or whether the order is issued by the family court as provided for in this chapter or whether the order is issued by a court or agency of another jurisdiction.

“Jurisdiction” means any state or political subdivision, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

“Magistrate ” means a magistrate of the family court pursuant to §

8-10-3.1

.

“Obligee” means any person or entity entitled to receive support under an order of support and includes an agency of another jurisdiction to which a person has assigned his or her right to support.

“Obligor” means any person required to make payments under the terms of a support order for a child, spouse, or former spouse.

“State plan” means the Rhode Island state plan for child and spousal support established in accordance with title IV, part D, § 454 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 654, which plan includes, but is not limited to, the establishment and enforcement of support orders on behalf of a person, whether residing in this state or another jurisdiction, who is:

Receiving public assistance pursuant to part A of title IV of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 601 et seq.;

Receiving foster care maintenance payments pursuant to part E of title IV of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.; or

Not receiving aid to families with dependent children nor foster care maintenance payments but who files an application for support enforcement services with the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, or any authorized title IV, part D agency of another jurisdiction.

“Support order” means a judgment, decree or order, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification, issued by the family court, by the division of taxation within the department of administration under §

15-16-7

or by a court or agency of another jurisdiction, for the benefit of a child, a spouse, or a former spouse, which provides for monetary support, health care, arrearages, or reimbursement, and may include related costs and fees, interest, income withholding, attorney’s fees, and other relief.

“Tribunal” means a court, administrative agency, or quasi-judicial entity authorized to establish, enforce, or modify support orders or to determine parentage.

“Withholding agent” means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association, trust, federal or state agency, department, or political subdivision, paying or obligated to pay income, as defined in this chapter, to an obligor.

“Remittee”, as used in this section, means the division of taxation, child support enforcement or its designee, authorized to receive wage withholding, including an agency designated by another state to receive income withholding pursuant to chapter 23.1 of title 15. Remittee does not include an individual obligee/custodial parent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 6; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 7; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 4; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 33.

15-16-3.
Remedies additional.

The income withholding remedy provided in this chapter is in addition to, and not in substitution for, any other remedy available to enforce a support order issued in this state or in another jurisdiction. Relief under this chapter shall not be denied, delayed, or affected because of the availability of other remedies, nor shall relief under any other statute be delayed or denied because of the availability of this remedy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1.

15-16-4.
Income withholding agency.

The division of taxation within the department of administration is designated as the state income withholding agency for all income withholding orders issued or registered in Rhode Island and shall have all powers, duties, and responsibilities to establish and administer income withholding in accordance with this chapter, and is further authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations that it deems necessary to implement the provisions and purposes of this chapter; provided, that any rule or regulation affecting the duties and responsibilities of the family court shall be made with the concurrence of the chief judge of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6.

15-16-5.
Requirement of income withholding — Support orders issued in this state or other jurisdictions.

In the case of each obligor against whom a support order: (i) has been issued or modified in this state; or (ii) has been issued or modified in another jurisdiction; or (iii) has been issued or modified in another jurisdiction and has been filed and registered with the department in accordance with §

15-16-13

, and in either case the order is being enforced under the state plan; so much of an obligor’s income must be withheld in an amount sufficient to comply with the order for current support when the obligor has failed to make payment of support as provided in this section or when the obligor or obligee has requested withholding in accordance with the requirements of this section.

If an obligor owes a support arrearage in addition to the amount to be withheld to comply with the order for current support, the order to withhold income must include an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the current support order, which amount shall be applied toward liquidation of support arrearages; provided, that the additional withholding to satisfy arrearages, when added to the amounts withheld to pay current support and to provide for the withholding agent’s fee provided in §

15-16-10

, may not exceed the limit permitted under § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b).

Upon petition by an obligor, the court in its discretion may reduce the amount required to be withheld in liquidation of support arrearages to a nominal or token amount, if the court finds that additional withholding would work an undue hardship on the obligor. The income withholding must occur without the need for any amendment to the support order involved or for any further action by the court or other entity which issued the order.

With respect to a support order issued or modified in this state, an obligor shall become subject to income withholding and the income withholding may be initiated by the department:

When the obligor has failed to make a support payment in full within fourteen (14) days of the due date for the support payment, notwithstanding that payment of the arrearage may be made subsequent to the obligor’s receipt of notice of income withholding or prior to the date of the hearing; or

The date on which the obligor requests, in writing, that the income withholding begin, whichever is earliest.

With respect to an order issued or modified in this state, the department may initiate income withholding:

Utilizing and relying on the information officially recorded on the CSE system as to support orders and arrearages; or

After receipt of a certified copy of the support order with all modification, together with the sworn statement of the obligee as to support arrearages and stating the name and address of the obligor and his or her employer or withholding agent.

With respect to a support order issued or modified in another jurisdiction, income withholding shall be initiated by the department when the support order has been filed and registered in accordance with §

15-16-13

, and the department and/or the court shall apply the law of the other jurisdiction as to amount or duration of support arrearages necessary to commence income withholding. In all other respects, the provisions of this chapter and the laws of this state shall apply.

The only basis for contesting income withholding initiated under this section is a mistake of fact. For purposes of this section, mistakes of fact shall be limited to the following:

An error in the amount of current support or support arrearage;

The mistaken identity of the obligor;

An error in the amount of income to be withheld in payment of current support and arrearages; or

The amount to be withheld exceeds the maximum amount permitted under § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b).

The burden shall be on the obligor to establish a defense of mistake of fact.

The department shall provide the obligor with notice required in §

15-16-6

regarding the income withholding initiated under this section and the procedures the obligor should follow if he or she desires to contest the income withholding on the grounds that the income withholding is not proper because of mistakes of fact. The notice shall be sent by regular mail at the obligor’s most recent address of record.

An obligor may contest the income withholding by filing or mailing a written statement with the department within fourteen (14) days of the mailing of the notice under §

15-16-6

, which statement shall specify the mistake or mistakes of fact claimed by the obligor.

Payment by an obligor of the support arrearage stated in the notice to the obligor is not a valid defense to income withholding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 478, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 6.

15-16-5.1.
Immediate income withholding — Support orders issued or modified on or after January 1, 1994.

With respect to a support order issued, enforced, or modified on or after January 1, 1994, the income of an obligor shall be subject to immediate income withholding under this chapter on the effective date of the order, regardless of whether support payments by the obligor are in arrears; provided, that the income of the obligor shall not be subject to immediate income withholding:

If a judge or magistrate of the family court finds that there is good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

If the obligor and obligee, and the department in the case of an obligee subject to an assignment of support rights under §

40-6-9

, enter into a written agreement or order which provides for an alternative arrangement for the timely payment of support due under the support order.

In no event shall the court order wage withholding payable to the obligee directly from any wage withholding agent.

The obligor shall be given advance notice, by way of the pleadings or otherwise, that his or her income is subject to immediate income withholding as provided in subsection (a) of this section, that the maximum amount of income to be withheld may not exceed the limit permitted under § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b), and that he or she may contest immediate income withholding, and assert any defenses, exceptions, or exemptions to which he or she may be entitled at a hearing before a judge or magistrate of the family court.

With the exception of those income withholding orders issued pursuant to §

15-23.1-501

, an immediate income withholding order issued under this section shall be filed by the department or the obligee with the clerk of the family court or, as appropriate, with the reciprocal office of the family court and shall be subject to the provisions of §§

15-16-9

—

15-16-13

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 25; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 7; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 4.

15-16-6.
Notice to obligor.

The notice to the obligor required under §

15-16-5

shall inform the obligor:

Of the amount of the support arrearage and the amount of income that has been withheld for payment of current support, arrearages, and any fees allowable under this chapter;

That the provision for withholding of income applies to any current or subsequent employer or period of employment;

Of the procedures available for contesting the withholding and that, in accordance with §

15-16-5

, the grounds for contesting the withholding are limited to mistakes of fact;

Of the period within which the obligor must file a statement contesting withholding with the department;

Of the opportunity to contest the income withholding at a hearing before a master of the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 6.

15-16-7.
Income withholding by withholding agency — Registry — Judicial review.

If an obligor or obligee requests income withholding or if the obligor fails to timely file his or her statement contesting income withholding as required under §

15-16-5

, the income withholding shall become effective without the necessity for a hearing before a magistrate of the family court, and the department shall issue an income withholding order to the withholding agent with notice of the order to the obligor, in accordance with §

15-16-9

.

The department shall maintain a central registry of all income withholding orders issued pursuant to this section and §

15-16-8

, and it shall enter these orders on the CSE system.

An obligor aggrieved by the issuance of an income withholding order by the department under this section shall be entitled to judicial review de novo by the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 478, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 7.

15-16-8.
Contesting withholding.

An obligor may request a family court hearing in writing within fourteen (14) days of the date of the mailing of the notice described in §

15-16-6

. The family court shall notify the obligor by first class mail of the date, time, and place of the hearing within five (5) days of receipt of the written request for hearing. The only basis for contesting income withholding initiated under this section is mistake of fact as set forth in §

15-16-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 6.

15-16-9.
Income withholding order — Service — Effectiveness — Contents.

An income withholding order under this chapter shall be binding upon a withholding agent one week after service, by personal service or by certified or registered mail, of a true copy of the income withholding order. The income withholding order shall be binding upon the withholding agent until further notice to the withholding agent in accordance with this chapter. Concurrently with the service of a true copy of the income withholding order upon a withholding agent, the department shall mail a true copy of the income withholding order by regular mail to the obligor.

Any income withholding order under this chapter shall have priority over any prior attachment, execution, garnishment, or wage or income assignment against the income of the obligor. An income withholding order under this chapter shall not be subject to any specific or statutory exemption or limitation prohibiting levy, execution, assignment, or attachment process or limiting the amount subject to income withholding under this chapter, except the exemptions or limitations as provided by federal law.

Every income withholding order issued pursuant to this chapter shall include the following:

That the income withholding order shall be binding upon a withholding agent one week after the service upon the withholding agent;

The total amount to be withheld from the obligor’s income for support and support arrearages;

The amount of fees a withholding agent may withhold from the income of an obligor in addition to support and support arrearages;

That the total amount to be withheld for support, support arrearages, and fees may not be in excess of the maximum amounts permitted under § 303(b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b);

That withholding is binding upon the withholding agent until notice by the department or the court;

That the withholding agent is subject to the duties and liabilities as provided in §

15-16-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1.

15-16-10.
Duties and liabilities of withholding agent.

An income withholding agent shall remit to the clerk of the family court, or any other remittee as directed in the income withholding order, all amounts withheld from the income of an obligor within seven (7) days of the date the income was paid or payable to the obligor, and the income withholding agent shall specify the date and amount of each withholding included in the remittance, the social security number of the obligor, the child support account number, the employee’s name, and any other information as required if electronic transfer is utilized. The withholding agent may combine withheld amounts from two (2) or more obligors into a single payment, provided that the withholding agent separately identifies the individual obligors and the amount attributable to each obligor.

An income withholding agent may deduct a fee of two dollars ($2.00) from the obligor’s remaining income for each payment made pursuant to an income withholding order under this chapter.

The income withholding agent must notify the department, in writing, of the termination of the obligor’s employment within ten (10) days of the termination. Notice shall include the last known address of the obligor and the name and address of the obligor’s new employer, if known.

Any withholding agent failing to comply with any of the requirements of this chapter may be punished by the family court or its magistrate for civil contempt. The court or its magistrate shall first afford the withholding agent a reasonable opportunity to purge itself of the contempt.

Any withholding agent who fails or refuses to deliver income pursuant to an income withholding order issued under this chapter, when the withholding agent has had in its possession the income, shall be personally liable for the amount of the income which the withholding agent failed or refused to deliver, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

Any withholding agent who dismisses, demotes, disciplines, refuses to hire, or in any way penalizes an obligor on account of any income withholding order issued under this chapter shall be liable to the obligor for all damages, together with costs, interest thereon, and reasonable attorney’s fees resulting from the action, and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100). The withholding agent shall be required to make full restitution to the aggrieved obligor, including reinstatements and back pay.

A withholding agent may be enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction from continuing any action in violation of this chapter.

Compliance by a withholding agent with an income withholding order issued under this chapter operates as a discharge of the withholding agent’s liability to the obligor as to that portion of the obligor’s income affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 478, § 2; P.L. 1994, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 6; P.L. 1998, ch. 442, § 7; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 33.

15-16-11.
Duration — Modification or revocation of order.

An income withholding order issued pursuant to this chapter shall remain in full force and effect until modified or revoked.

The order may be modified or revoked by the court upon application and for good cause shown, provided that the payment by the obligor of all support arrearages shall not be the sole basis for modification or revocation of the income withholding order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6.

15-16-12.
Allocation of amounts withheld — Refunds — Distribution.

In the event that there are two (2) or more income withholding orders against the same income of an obligor, the department shall allocate and distribute the amount remitted by the withholding agent between or among the separate income withholding orders giving priority to current support obligations as follows:

Each obligee shall be allocated an amount in the proportion which each obligee’s current support order under income withholding bears relative to the total of all amounts for current support under income withholding orders; and

Any remaining withheld income shall be allocated to each obligee in an amount proportional to which each obligee’s arrearage order under income withholding bears relative to the total of all amounts ordered to be paid on arrearages under income withholding orders.

The department shall promptly refund to an obligor the amounts, if any, which may have been improperly withheld.

The department shall promptly distribute amounts received under income withholding orders in accordance with § 457 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 657.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 209, § 1.

15-16-13.
Registering support orders of another jurisdiction for purposes of income withholding.

A party seeking to enforce a support order or an income-withholding order, or both, issued by a tribunal of another state may send the documents required for registering the order to a support enforcement agency of this state.

Upon receipt of the documents, the support enforcement agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce an income-withholding order. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the support enforcement agency shall register the order.

At any hearing contesting proposed income withholding based on a support order registered under this section, the registered order, accompanying sworn or certified statement, and a certified copy of an income withholding order, if any, still in effect shall constitute prima facie proof, without further proof or foundation, that the support order is valid, that the amount of current support payments and arrearages is as stated, and that the obligee or agency would be entitled to income withholding under the law of the jurisdiction which issued the support order. Once a prima facie case has been established, the obligor may only raise the defense of mistake of fact as stated in §

15-16-5

.

The following documentation is required for the registration of a support order of another jurisdiction:

A letter of transmittal requesting registration and enforcement;

Two (2) copies, including one certified copy, of all orders to be registered, including any modification of an order;

A sworn statement by the party seeking registration or a certified statement by the custodian of the records showing the amount of any arrearage;

The name of the obligor and, if known:

The obligor’s address and social security number;

The name and address of the obligor’s employer and any other source of income of the obligor; and

A description and the location of property of the obligor in this state not exempt from execution; and

The name and address of the obligee and, if applicable, the agency or person to whom support payments are to be remitted.

On receipt of a request for registration, the registering tribunal shall cause the order to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one copy of the documents and information, regardless of their form.

A registered order issued in another state is enforceable in the same manner and is subject to the same procedures as an order issued by a tribunal of this state. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, a registered order if the issuing tribunal had jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6.

15-16-14.
Voluntary income withholding.

The obligor of a support order of another jurisdiction may obtain voluntary income withholding by filing with the department a request for withholding and a certified copy of the support order. The department shall issue an income withholding order under §

15-16-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1.

15-16-15.
Initiation of income withholding with other jurisdictions.

With respect to a state that has not adopted the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (UIFSA), on behalf of any client for whom the department is already providing services, or on application of a resident of this state who is an obligee or obligor of a support order issued by this state, or of an agency to whom the obligee has assigned support rights, the department shall promptly request the agency of another jurisdiction in which the obligor of a support order derives income to enter the order for the purpose of obtaining income withholding against that income.

The department shall compile and promptly transmit to the agency of the other jurisdiction all documentation required to enter a support order for this purpose.

The department also shall immediately transmit to the agency of the other jurisdiction a certified copy of any subsequent modifications of the support order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 6.

15-16-16.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it shall for any reason be judged invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of the chapter, but shall be confined in its effect to the provision or application directly involved in the controversy giving rise to the judgment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 163, § 1.